src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1ateqpropVZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+Orth/Alt:%>-kkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+Sem/Hum+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ; !Z2aqZ aqqinut atortussaanngilaq
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r ;
+Sem/Hum+TUQAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCtoqaq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar TV ;
		Z1ateqpropVZ ;
		
LEXICON Z1instpropVZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/inst+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>araq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/inst+KKUT+Der/nn:%>kkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/inst+KKUT+Der/nn+Orth/Alt:%>-kkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/inst+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/inst+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/inst+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+Sem/inst+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r ;
+Sem/inst+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/inst+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ; !Z2aqZ aqqinut atortussaanngilaq
+Sem/inst+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/inst+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/inst+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r ;
+Sem/inst+TUQAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCtoqaq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/inst+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu IV_voq ;
+Sem/inst+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar TV ;
+Sem/inst: Z1instpropVZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateqpropCZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+KKUT+Der/nn+Orth/Alt:%>-kkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ; !Z2aqZ aqqinut atortussaanngilaq
+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r ;
+TUQAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCtoqaq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu IV_voq ;
+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar TV ;
		Z1ateqpropCZ ;
		
LEXICON Z2-ateqZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkuinnaq tup- ; !Arfakkuinnaanngillat
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ tp ;
+Prop+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>suaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+KKUT+Der/nn:%>suakkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop@C.Num@+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu@C.Num@ IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U@C.Num@+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar@C.Num@ TV ;
			Z2-ateqZ ;
			
LEXICON Z2ateq_niqZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCru IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCrunerar TV ;
			Z2ateq_niqZ ;

LEXICON Z2ateq_neqZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ; !Z2aqZ aqqinut atortussaanngilaq
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar TV ;
			Z2ateq_neqZ ;

LEXICON Z2suaq_ateqZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%VCTRUNCu IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%VCTRUNCunerar TV ;
			Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
			
LEXICON Z1ateqZmorf
@U.prop.norm@ Z1ateqZmorf_all ;

LEXICON Z1ateqZmorf_poss
@U.prop.poss@ Z1ateqZ_infl ;

LEXICON Z1ateqZmorf_all
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+Orth/Alt:%>-kkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+Sem/Hum+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+TUQAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCtoqaq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
+UTE+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCutinnguaq Z1nnguaq_possessumZ ; !PL20220201 Nyt LEX udelukkende til possessum som Nikkiutinnguarput
			Z1ateqZ ;

		
LEXICON Z1ateq_tptZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>eeraq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>ikkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>ikkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>ikkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>ikulunnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>innguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>ipalaarsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCssuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>ersuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>ersuannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCssuannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>aa IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>aanerar TV ;
			Z1ateq_tptZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateq_atZmorf
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCraq Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn+Orth/Alt+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq Z2suaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCa IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCanerar TV ;
			Z1ateq_atZ ;
			
